Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2208
Independent evaluation of pilot project.

The department shall contract with an academic institution to complete an independent evaluation of the pilot project created under section 43-2204. The evaluation shall assess the effectiveness of the pilot project in achieving the purposes described in section 43-2201 and the overall fiscal impact. The evaluation shall begin after completion of the second year of the pilot project and shall be completed in the third year of the pilot project. The department shall electronically transmit the evaluation to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 8.